Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1304
Funds held or owing by any utility; presumed abandoned; when.

The following funds held or owing by any utility are presumed abandoned:

(a) Any deposit made by a subscriber with a utility to secure payment for, or any sum paid in advance for, utility services to be furnished in this state, less any lawful deductions, that has remained unclaimed by the person appearing on the records of the utility entitled thereto for more than three years after the termination of the services for which the deposit or advance payment was made.

(b) Any sum which a utility has been ordered to refund and which was received for utility services rendered in this state, together with any interest thereon, less any lawful deductions, that has remained unclaimed by the person appearing on the records of the utility entitled thereto for more than three years after the date it became payable in accordance with the final determination or order providing for the refund.

Laws 1969, c. 611, § 4, p. 2481;

Laws 1977, LB 305, § 3;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 26, § 6.